District of Columbia statutes.
28-5209

Civil penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter, or any regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $500 for each violation.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-282, § 2(c), 60 DCR 2132